Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 8 Georgia Council on Developmental Disabilities

30-8-1.
Creation; purpose; members; duties; funding; expenses.

There is created the Georgia Council on Developmental Disabilities. The council shall serve as the designated state agency and state planning council for purposes of carrying out the provisions of Chapter 75 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter amended, relating to programs for persons with developmental disabilities.

The members of the council shall be appointed by the Governor from among the residents of the state, and the composition of the council shall comply with the membership requirements of Chapter 75 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter amended. The Governor shall consider appointing to the council persons representing a broad range of individuals with developmental disabilities and individuals interested in programs for the developmentally disabled. To the extent feasible, appointments to the council shall be made with a view toward equitable geographic, racial, and ethnic representation.

Each member shall serve for a term of four years or until a successor is appointed. Members shall be eligible to succeed themselves. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments. The council shall elect its own chairperson and such other officers as it deems necessary. The council may adopt rules and procedures and shall meet at the call of the chairperson.

The Georgia Council on Developmental Disabilities shall:

Develop and implement a state plan, which includes the specification of federal and state priority areas, to address on a state-wide and comprehensive basis the need for services, support, and other assistance for individuals with developmental disabilities and their families;

Monitor, review, and evaluate, not less than annually, the implementation and effectiveness of the plan;

Submit to the United States secretary of health and human services, through the Governor, such plan and periodic reports on the council’s activities as the secretary finds necessary;

Receive, account for, and disburse funds paid to the state pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 75 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter amended, and as authorized by the approved state plan;

To the maximum extent feasible, review and comment on all plans in the state which relate to programs affecting persons with developmental disabilities;

Serve as an advocate for persons with developmental disabilities;

Advise the Governor, the General Assembly, and all other state agencies in matters relating to developmentally disabled persons; and

Fulfill the responsibilities and meet the requirements of a designated state agency and of a state planning council as provided by Chapter 75 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter amended.

The Georgia Council on Developmental Disabilities shall be attached to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for administrative purposes only as provided in Code Section 50-4-3. The council shall recruit and hire staff as provided by law and as the council determines necessary to carry out its duties. All costs incurred by the council shall be covered by funds paid to the state under Chapter 75 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter amended, except that members who are state employees shall be reimbursed for their expenses by their agency in the same manner as other state employees. Members who are not state employees shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses, including travel and any other expenses incurred in performance of their council duties, from funds appropriated to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-8-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 406, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-8/HB 228.